South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Occupational diseases, firefighters SECTION 1.    Section 42-11-30(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, for purposes of the South Carolina Workers' Compensation Law, any impairment or injury to the health of a firefighter caused by heart disease, stroke, or respiratory disease resulting in total or partial disability or death is presumed to have arisen out of and in the course of employment, unless the contrary is shown by competent evidence, if the firefighter is at the time of such impairment or injury a bona fide member of a municipal, county, state, port authority, or fire control district fire department in this State. In order to be entitled to the presumption provided for in this section, any person becoming a member of a fire department after May 29, 1968, must be under the age of thirty-seven years and must have successfully passed a physical examination by a competent physician upon entering into such service or by July 1, 2012, a written report of which must have been made and filed before any alleged injury with the fire department, which examination failed to reveal any evidence of such condition or conditions, and the condition or conditions developed while actively engaged in fighting a fire, a technical rescue incident, or a firefighter training exercise that involves stressful or strenuous physical activity, or within twenty-four hours thereof. This presumption does not apply to clerical, administrative, or sedentary activities. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________